Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2142.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of June 9, 1936 (Sp.Sess.1, P.L.13, No.4), entitled "An act imposing an emergency State tax on liquor, as herein defined, sold by the Pennsylvania Liquor Control Board; providing for the collection and payment of such tax; and imposing duties upon the Department of Revenue and the Pennsylvania Liquor Control Board," is repealed:[AN ACTImposing an emergency State tax on liquor, as herein defined, sold by the Pennsylvania Liquor Control Board; providing for the collection and payment of such tax; and imposing duties upon the Department of Revenue and the Pennsylvania Liquor Control Board.1234567891011121314151617181920 Section 1. Be it enacted, &c., That the following words, terms, and phrases used in this act are, for the purposes hereof, defined, as follows:"Liquor." Any alcoholic, spirituous, vinous, fermented, or other alcoholic beverage, or combination of liquors and mixed liquor, a part of which is spirituous, vinous, fermented, or otherwise alcoholic, and all drinks or drinkable liquids, preparations or mixtures intended for beverage purposes, which contain more than one-half of one per centum of alcohol by volume, except alcohol, and malt or brewed beverages."Department." The Department of Revenue of this Commonwealth."Board." The Pennsylvania Liquor Control Board of this Commonwealth."Fiscal Month." The monthly period established, from time to time, by the Pennsylvania Liquor Control Board for the purpose of conducting its business.Section 2. An emergency State tax is hereby imposed and assessed at the rate of eighteen per centum of the net price of all liquors sold by the board. The tax herein imposed shall be collected by the board from the purchasers of the liquor from the board. The amount of such eighteen per centum so collected by the board, under the provisions of this act, shall be paid into the State Treasury, through the department, in the manner and within the times herein specified, and shall be credited to the General Fund.Section 3. It shall be the duty of the board to transmit to the department on, or before, the fifteenth day of each calendar month, a statement of its receipts from sales of liquor and taxes collected during the preceding fiscal month, and such other information as may be necessary to effectuate the 20260HB2142PN2767 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 provisions of this act, at which time it shall also be the duty of the board to pay to the department the tax imposed upon such liquor by the provisions of this act: Provided, That the board may, in its discretion, add the tax imposed by this act to the wholesale and retail price at which liquors are sold and eliminate any accounting of such tax separate from sale prices, and in such case, the amount of the tax for any calendar month shall be ascertained by dividing the entire gross receipts derived from sales at Pennsylvania liquor stores during such month by six and five-ninths (6 5/9), and the quotient thus obtained shall be deemed the amount of the tax for such month payable over, under this section.Section 4. This act shall become effective immediately upon its final enactment.]Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2142PN2767 - 3 - 123456789101112131415